Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.100

Compensation and expenses—In general.

(1) Unless otherwise compensated or reimbursed, an attorney for a respondent in a proceeding under this chapter is entitled to reasonable compensation for services and reimbursement of reasonable expenses from the property of the respondent.

(2) Unless otherwise compensated or reimbursed, an attorney, or other person whose services resulted in an order beneficial to an individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship or for whom a protective arrangement under Article 5 of this chapter was ordered, is entitled to reasonable compensation for services and reimbursement of reasonable expenses from the property of the individual.

(3) Where the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship is a department of social and health services client, or health care authority client, and is required to contribute a portion of their income towards the cost of long-term care services or room and board, the amount of compensation or reimbursement shall not exceed the amount allowed by the department of social and health services or health care authority by rule.

(4) Where the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship receives guardianship, conservatorships, or other protective services from the *office of public guardianship, the amount of compensation or reimbursement shall not exceed the amount allowed by the *office of public guardianship.

(5) The court must approve compensation and expenses payable under this section before payment. Approval is not required before a service is provided or an expense is incurred.

(6) If the court dismisses a petition under this chapter and determines the petition was filed in bad faith, the court may assess the cost of any court-ordered professional evaluation, court-appointed attorney, or court visitor against the petitioner.

[ 2024 c 267 s 2; 2020 c 312 s 304; 2019 c 437 s 120.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "office of public guardianship" was renamed the "office of public guardianship and conservatorship" by 2020 c 312 s 403.

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.